California statutes. Public Contract Code
(i) A supplier may be excluded from bid processes if the supplier’s performance with respect to a previously awarded contract has been unsatisfactory, as determined by the state in accordance with established procedures that shall be maintained in the State Administrative Manual. This exclusion shall not exceed 36 months for any one determination of unsatisfactory performance. Any
 supplier excluded in accordance with this section shall be reinstated as a qualified supplier at any time during this 36-month period, upon demonstrating to the Department of General Services’ satisfaction that the problems that resulted in the supplier’s exclusion have been corrected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   (AB 661)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.3.

(a) The department shall conduct a postevaluation of each contract for the acquisition of information technology services totaling five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more that it executes.

(b) The department shall evaluate the performance of the contractor in doing the work for which the contract was awarded. The department
 shall base a postevaluation on objective facts and support them with program and contract performance data. The Department of Technology and the Department of General Services shall jointly develop a standard form or forms and the procedures to implement this section. Each department shall use the standard form or forms that contain objective postevaluation factors or metrics appropriate to the nature of the information technology service and project type. In developing a standard postevaluation form or forms
 under this subdivision, the Department of Technology and the Department of General Services shall jointly gather feedback from stakeholders in the information technology industry to ensure that the use of any factors or metrics on the standard form or forms are appropriate to the nature of the information technology service or project type. A public official who signs a postevaluation shall confirm its accuracy. The department shall use a standard form developed pursuant to this subdivision
 to report on all of the following:

(1) Whether the contracted work was completed within the time specified in the contract.

(2) Whether the contracted work
 was completed within the budget specified in the contract.

(3) Factors outside the control of the contractor that caused difficulties in contractor performance.

(4) Other information the department, the Department of Technology, or the Department of General Services may require.

(c) If the contractor’s performance was judged unsatisfactory on any of the factors
 or metrics specified in a standard postevaluation form developed pursuant to subdivision (b) and was not mitigated by any factors or metrics outside the control of the contractor that may have caused difficulties in the contractor’s performance, the postevaluation shall be considered unsatisfactory for the purposes of subdivisions (e) and (f).

(d) The postevaluation shall be prepared within 60 days of the completion of the contract.

(e) Postevaluations shall remain on file at the offices of the department for a period of 36 months following contract completion.
 The department conducting the postevaluation shall place one copy of the postevaluation form in the department’s contract file and, if the department is not the Department of Technology, send one copy of the form to the Department of Technology within five working days of the completion of the postevaluation. The postevaluations and contractor responses on file shall not be public records. The Department of Technology shall act as a central depository for all departments making postevaluations or desiring information on a contractor’s record with the state and shall send a copy of any postevaluation report and response to the contracting manager or contracting officer of any department, upon request. Failure by a department to send a postevaluation to the Department of Technology may be grounds for the rejection of future delegation of
 information technology projects pursuant to Section 11546 of the Government Code.

(f) (1) Upon submitting an unsatisfactory postevaluation to the Department of Technology, the department shall notify and send a copy of the postevaluation to the contractor within 15 days. 

(2) A contractor may comment on a negative postevaluation. Comments made pursuant to
 this paragraph shall be submitted to the department and the Department of Technology, to be attached to and filed with the copies of the postevaluation required to be filed pursuant to subdivision (e).

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Department” means the state agency that receives the information technology services.

(2) “Information technology services” means services, including, but not limited to, information technology personal services and information technology consulting services, acquired in connection with an information technology project, as defined in Section 4819.2 of the State Administrative
 Manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   (AB 971)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.

In addition to the mandatory requirements enumerated in Sections 12102, 12102.1, and 12102.2, the acquisition policies and procedures developed by the Department of Technology and the Department of General Services in accordance with this chapter may provide for the following:

(a) Price negotiation with respect to contracts entered into in accordance with this chapter.

(b) System or equipment component performance, or availability standards, including an assessment of the added cost to the state to receive contractual guarantee of a level of performance.

(c) Requirement of a bond or assessment of a cost penalty with
 respect to a contract or consideration of a contract offered by a supplier whose performance has been determined unsatisfactory in accordance with established procedures maintained in the State Administrative Manual as required by Section 12102.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 60.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.5.

For those information technology purchases for which the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology determines that a request for proposal (RFP) is appropriate, the controlling department, as specified under Section 12100, shall identify and document the following, with respect to information technology procurements, prior to releasing the RFP:

(a) Identify the legislative mandate, state business, or operational reason for the information technology procurement.

(b) Identify the existing business processes currently used to accomplish the legislative mandate, state business, or operational reason.

(c) Identify the most important priorities for the information technology project to accomplish.

(d) Identify what current technology is being used and how it is being used.

(e) If the data used in a proposed information technology system comes from multiple sources, identify the existing business processes or technical systems that produce and maintain the source data to ensure interoperability.

(f) Identify how the new information technology project leverages existing technology investments while accomplishing its business objectives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 61.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.

(a) (1) The State Contracting Manual shall set forth all procedures and methods that shall be used by the state when seeking to obtain bids for the acquisition of information technology.

(2) Revisions to the manual must be publicly announced, including, but not limited to, postings on the Internet Web site homepage of the Department of General Services. The Department of Technology shall provide a link to the State Contracting Manual on its Internet Web site homepage.

(b) The Department of General Services and the Department of Technology in accordance with this chapter shall develop, implement, and maintain standardized methods for the
 development of all information technology requests for proposals.

(c) All information technology requests for proposals shall be reviewed by the Department of Technology prior to release to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 62.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.5.

(a) All rules and requirements governing an information technology acquisition, for which the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology determines that a request for proposal (RFP) is appropriate, shall be communicated in writing to all vendors that have expressed an intent to bid and shall be posted in a public location. Any changes to the rules and requirements governing that RFP shall be communicated in writing to all vendors that have expressed an intent to bid and shall be posted in a public location. Requirements other than those provided by law or outside of the published RFP and posted addendums shall not be used to score bids.

(b) (1) All requests for proposals shall
 contain the following statement:

“It is unlawful for any person engaged in business within this state to sell or use any article or product as a “loss leader” as defined in Section 17030 of the Business and Professions Code.”

(2) The Department of General Services shall post in the State Contracting Manual instructions for including the statement required by paragraph (1) in all affected contracts.

(3) The statement required by paragraph (1) shall be deemed to be part of a request for proposal even if the statement is inadvertently omitted from the request for proposal.

(c) The requirements of this section shall be in addition to any other requirement provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 63.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12105.

The Department of General Services and the Department of Technology shall coordinate in the development of policies and procedures that implement the intent of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 64.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12106.

The Department of General Services and the Department of Technology may, in addition to fulfilling the mandatory requirements enumerated in Sections 12102, 12102.1, and 12102.2, adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 65.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12108.

Until the time that the Department of General Services and the Department of Technology have published in the State Administrative Manual the procedures required in accordance with Section 12102, acquisitions of information technology goods and services shall be accomplished in accordance with either existing State Administrative Manual procedures for the acquisition of information technology goods and services, or Article 2 (commencing with Section 14790) of Chapter 6 of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as determined by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 66.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12109.

The Director of General Services and the Director of Technology may make the services of their respective departments under this chapter available, upon the terms and conditions that may be deemed satisfactory, to any tax-supported public agency in the state, including a school district, for assisting the agency in the acquisition of information technology goods or services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 67.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12112.

(a) Any contract for information technology goods or services, to be manufactured or performed by the contractor especially for the state and not suitable for sale to others in the ordinary course of the contractor’s business may provide, on the terms and conditions that the controlling department, as specified in Section 12100, deems necessary to protect the state’s interests, for progress payments for work performed and costs incurred at the contractor’s shop or plant, provided that not less than 10 percent of the contract price is required to be withheld until final delivery and acceptance of the goods or services. Notwithstanding this subdivision, if the department determines that lesser withholding levels are appropriate based upon an evaluation of risk determined under subdivision
 (b) and the contract price is ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or more, the department shall withhold no less than 5 percent of the contract price until final delivery and acceptance of the goods or services. If the department determines that lesser withholding levels are appropriate based on an evaluation of risk determined under subdivision (b) and the contract price is less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000), the department shall withhold no less than 3 percent of the contract price until final delivery and acceptance of the goods or services.

(b) The Department of General Services, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall develop and maintain criteria for the evaluation of risk to the state that results from the acquisition of information technology. This risk analysis shall determine the need for financial protection that is in the best interest of the state, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) An acceptable performance bond as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 995.010) of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) Any surety as defined in Section 2787 of the Civil Code.

(3) A letter of credit as described in Division 5 (commencing with Section 5101) of the Commercial Code.

(4) Protection in the form of contract terms.

(5) Any other form of security or guaranty of performance in an amount sufficient to protect the state in the case of default by the contractor providing information technology, or any other breach or malfunction of the goods or services, or both.

(c) For purposes of this
 section, “information technology” means information technology goods or services, or both, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 68.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12112.1.

(a) Software license contracts allowing the use of the software for a specified time period with recurring payments may be paid in advance subject to the procedures, terms, and conditions that the controlling department, as specified in Section 12100, deems necessary to protect the state’s interests.

(b) If an agreement combines the purchase of software with contracted personnel, this section may be applied only to the software purchase and payment in advance for contracted personnel is prohibited. “Contracted personnel” includes, but is not limited to, consulting services, instructor-led training, and other personal services.

(c) A single payment for a lifetime license is
 permitted.

(d) Advance payments authorized under this section shall not exceed three years.

(e) Procedures, terms, and conditions shall address, at minimum, all of the following:

(1) Annual advance payment provisions for multiyear agreements.

(2) Encouraging suppliers to develop higher levels of service and support.

(3) Financial risk, including supplier’s financial stability.

(4) The supplier’s prior record of performance.

(5) Reassignment of licenses within the contract term.

(6) A cancellation
 clause to protect the state’s interests.

(f) Acquisitions shall be accomplished in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 84, Sec. 34.   (SB 172)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12113.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, state and local agencies may enter into agreements to pay for telecommunications services to be utilized beyond the current fiscal year. “Telecommunications services” for purposes of this section shall include, but not be limited to, central office-based leased communications systems equipped with primary station lines, capable of receiving in-dialed voice and data communications and capable of out-dialing voice and data communications and any customer premised equipment, software and installation costs necessary for utilization by the state or local agency.

(b) State and local agencies may enter into financing agreements for the acquisition of telecommunications services whenever the state or local agency may derive monetary benefit and greater services as a result of its ability to acquire capital at lower interest cost than the supplier of those services can provide directly to the agency or whenever the state or local agency may obtain a reduced cost of service based on length of agreement if offered by the supplier of telecommunications service.

(c) Acquisition requirements for financing of telecommunications goods and services shall be considered to have been met whenever the financing is within the scope of public sector requests for proposals or whenever the financing is offered by a sole source provider or that provider’s assignee.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to alter or circumvent any existing acquisition procedure or requirement, nor to alter or circumvent the acquisition authority of any state or local agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 776, Sec. 49.   Effective September 27, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Acquisition of Telecommunications Goods and Services [12120. - 12120.]

12120.

The Legislature finds and declares that, with the advent of deregulation in the telecommunications industry, substantial cost savings can be realized by the state through the specialized evaluation and acquisition of alternative telecommunications systems. Any contract for the acquisition of telecommunications services and any contract for the acquisition of telecommunications goods, whether by lease or purchase, shall be made by, or under the supervision of, the Department of Technology. Any acquisition shall be accomplished in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100), relating to the acquisition of information technology goods and services, except to the extent any directive or provision is uniquely applicable to information technology acquisitions. The Department of Technology shall have
 responsibility for the establishment of policy and procedures for telecommunications. The Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall assume the functions of the agency with regard to acquisition of telecommunications goods and services by the California State University and the California Community Colleges, respectively. The trustees and the board shall each grant to the agency an opportunity to bid whenever the university or the college system solicits bids for telecommunications goods and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 69.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.6. The Alternative Protest Pilot Project [12125. - 12129.]

12125.

There is hereby established the Alternative Protest Process to be administered by the Department of General Services and the Department of Technology in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100) of Part 2 of Division 2 and this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 71.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12126.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any department or agency may use the solicitation and alternative protest procedures outlined in this chapter for solicitations authorized under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100). The Department of General Services shall develop procedures and guidelines for the implementation of this alternative protest process.

(b) To be eligible for this alternative protest process, the contracting department shall agree to participate in the Alternative Protest Process and the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology, as appropriate, shall indicate that the proposed solicitation shall be
 conducted as part of the Alternative Protest Process prior to release of the solicitation. Submission of a bid constitutes consent for participation in the Alternative Protest Process. Any protests filed in relation to the proposed contract award shall be conducted under the procedures set forth by the Department of General Services for the Alternative Protest Process.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any bid protest conducted under this chapter shall include one or more of the following alternative procedures:

(1) The Alternative Protest Process shall not prevent the commencement of work in accordance with the terms of any other contract awarded pursuant to this chapter. A contract may be entered into pending a final decision on the protest.

(2) The Department of General Services, in bid protests
 for procurements it conducts or supervises, shall review the protest within seven days of the filing date to determine if the protest is frivolous. If determined to be frivolous, the protest shall not proceed under this chapter until the bidder posts a protest bond in an amount not less than 10 percent of the estimated contract value, as determined by the Department of General Services in the solicitation.

(3) The Department of Technology, in bid protests for procurements it conducts or supervises pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12100 and telecommunications procurements made pursuant to Section 12120, shall review the protest within seven days of the filing date to determine if the protest is frivolous. If determined to be frivolous, the protest shall not proceed under this chapter until the bidder posts a protest bond in an amount not less than 10 percent of the estimated contract value, as determined by the Department
 of Technology in the solicitation.

(4) The Director of General Services or the Director of Technology, as appropriate under paragraphs (2) and (3), shall issue a decision within a period not to exceed 45 days from the date the protest is filed.

(5) Arbitration, as defined and established by the Department of General Services, shall be the resolution tool.

(d) Authority to protest under this chapter shall be limited to participating bidders.

(1) Grounds for major information technology acquisition protests shall be limited to violations of the solicitation procedures and that the protestant should have been selected.

(2) Any other acquisition protest filed pursuant to this chapter shall be
 based on the ground that the bid or proposal should have been selected in accordance with selection criteria in the solicitation document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 72.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12127.

Major information technology acquisitions subject to this chapter shall meet the following criteria:

(a) The agency or department has stated its business needs and not detailed specification in the solicitation.

(b) The agency or department has stated the criteria and the weight to be given to each criterion by which it will evaluate all proposals.

(c) The contract shall be awarded based on “value effective acquisition,” as that term is defined in Section 12100.7, competitive negotiation, an alternative procurement, or performance-based solicitations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 762, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12127.5.

All other procurements subject to this chapter shall meet one or more of the following criteria:

(a) The agency or department has stated its business needs and not detailed specification in the solicitation.

(b) The agency or department has stated the criteria and the weight to be given to each criterion by which it will evaluate all proposals.

(c) The contract shall be awarded based on “value effective acquisition,” as that term is defined in Section 12100.7, competitive negotiation, an alternative procurement, performance-based solicitations, or other methodologies as established by the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 762, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12128.

The Department of General Services and the Department of Technology in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100) of Part 2 of Division 2 and this chapter shall apply this chapter to the following categories:

(a) Information technology and ancillary services.

(b) Material, supplies, equipment, and ancillary services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 73.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12129.

The Department of General Services shall electronically submit a report and recommendations to the Legislature regarding the Alternative Protest Process on or before January 1, 2007, and on or before January 1, 2010. The report shall include the following:

(a) The percentage of bids with values under five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), under one million dollars ($1,000,000), and over one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more that were not subject to the Alternative Protest Process that were protested.

(b) The percentage of bids with values under five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), under one million dollars ($1,000,000), and over one million dollars ($1,000,000) that were subject to the Alternative Protest Process that were protested.

(c) The number of protests determined to be frivolous by the Department of General Services, subject to this chapter, with corresponding data for solicitations issued pursuant to existing procedures.

(d) The percentage of contracts awarded under the Alternative Protest Process that were subsequently challenged in a court of law with corresponding data for solicitations issued pursuant to existing procedures.

(e) The length of time to resolve protests pursuant to this chapter and the corresponding data for solicitations issued pursuant to existing procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 272, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.7. Prohibition of the Offshoring of State Public Benefits Contracts [12140. - 12140.]

12140.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any state agency authorized to enter into contracts relating to public benefit programs shall only contract for services provided by a call center that directly serves applicants for, recipients of, or enrollees in, those public benefit programs with a contractor that certifies in its bid for the contract that the services provided under the contract and any subcontract performed under that contract, to applicants for, recipients of, or enrollees in, those public benefit programs, will be performed solely with workers employed in California. Any contractor that knowingly provides false information in the certification required by this subdivision shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in addition to any other remedies available to the state
 agency. An action for a civil penalty under this subdivision may be brought by any public prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Call center” means a building, facility, or operation where customer or client services or assistance is provided by telephone, fax, email, text, or web-based interaction.

(2) “Public benefit programs” means California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs), CalFresh, Medi-Cal, Healthy Families, and the California Healthcare Eligibility, Enrollment, and Retention System.

(c) (1) The contract shall provide that in the event a contractor or subcontractor performs the contract or the subcontract for call center services with
 workers not employed in California during the life of the contract, the state has the right to terminate the contract for noncompliance and the contractor or subcontractor shall pay a penalty to the state agency in an amount equal to the amount paid by the state agency for the percentage of work that was performed with workers not employed in California.

(2) The penalty authorized in paragraph (1) shall be in addition to any other applicable penalty, including, but not limited to, the penalty provided in subdivision (a).

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a state agency may conduct a solicitation without applying this section if the California Health and Human Services Agency or the board of the California Health Benefit Exchange makes any of the following determinations:

(A) A prior
 solicitation was conducted and the bids received were priced unreasonably high as a result of including these provisions.

(B) A prior solicitation was conducted and fewer than two bids were received as a result of including these provisions.

(C) The services are needed in cases of emergency where immediate acquisition is necessary for the protection of the public health, welfare or safety.

(2) If the agency or board makes a determination described in paragraph (1), that entity shall submit a report to the Assembly Committee on Jobs, Economic Development and the Economy and to the Senate Committee on Labor and Industrial Relations on or before the last day of the quarter following the quarter in which the determination was made. The report shall include the reason for making the determination.

(e) This section shall not apply to the following:

(1) A contract or subcontract, if implementation would violate the specific terms of the Agreement on Government Procurement of the World Trade Organization or any other bilateral or regional free trade agreement to which the State of California has consented.

(2) A contract or subcontract, including extensions of that contract or subcontract, that results from a request for proposal or bid that occurred prior to the effective date of the act that adds this chapter.

(3) A contract for a public benefit program between a state agency and a health care service plan or a specialized health care service plan regulated by the Department of Managed Health Care, and any subcontract performed under that contract,
 or a disability insurer or specialized health insurer regulated by the Department of Insurance, and any subcontract performed under that contract.

(f) This section shall be construed so as to not conflict with, and be applied consistent with, federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 162.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.9. Offshoring University of California and California State University Contracts [12147. - 12147.]

12147.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after July 1, 2017, neither the University of California nor the California State University may contract for services with a contractor or subcontractor unless that contractor or subcontractor
 does either of the following:

 (A) Certifies, under penalty of perjury, in his or her bid for that contract that the contract, and any subcontract performed under that contract, will be performed solely with workers within the United States.

(B) Describes in his or her bid any
 parts of the work that will be performed by workers outside of the United States.

(2) If the University of California or the California State University enters into a services contract with a contractor whose bid indicates that specific work will be performed by workers outside of the United States, the University of California or the California State University, as appropriate, shall not, for the duration of that contract, displace an employee performing that specific work.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, neither the University of California nor the California State University may expend funds to train service contract employees located in foreign
 countries or train service contract employees who plan to relocate to a foreign country as part of the service contract, if that service contract displaces an employee of the University of California or the California State University.

(c) A contract entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall provide that, in the event a contractor or subcontractor performs the contract or the subcontract with workers outside the United States during the life of the
 contract and the contractor or subcontractor does not describe this work in his or her bid as referenced in subdivision (a), the contract shall be terminated for noncompliance, and the contractor or subcontractor shall forfeit penalties to the University of California or the California State University, as appropriate, in an amount equal to the amount paid by the university for the percentage of work that was performed with workers outside the United States.

(d) (1) A contractor shall be found to have violated subdivision (a) only to the extent that he or she fails to note in
 a bid any work to be accomplished by workers outside of the United States. The University of California or the California State University shall be found to have violated subdivision (a) only to the extent that the University of California or the California State University displaces an employee performing that specific work after having been notified in the contractor’s bid that the specific work would be performed by workers outside of the United States.

(2) For purposes of this section, “displace” means the layoff, demotion, involuntary transfer to a new classification, involuntary transfer to a new location, or time base reduction of an
 employee, during the operation of a contract that is subject to this chapter, where the employee is performing the specific work that a contractor has identified as to be performed by workers outside of the United States and the reason for the layoff, demotion, involuntary transfer to a new classification, or time base reduction of the employee is a direct result of the University of California or the California State University entering into the contract that is subject to this chapter.

(3) Notwithstanding the limitations imposed by subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), nothing in this section shall preclude the University of California and the California State University from contracting with a contractor or subcontractor that utilizes workers in offshore operations in circumstances that do not directly result in the displacement of an employee of the University of California or the California State University.

(e) This chapter does not apply to a contract if refusing to award that contract, on the basis that the contractor or subcontractor does not certify under penalty of perjury that the contract, and any subcontract performed under that
 contract, will be performed solely with workers within the United States, would violate the specific terms of the Agreement on Government Procurement of the World Trade Organization or any other bilateral or regional free trade agreement that California has consented to.

(f) This chapter does not apply to either of the following:

(1) Contracts relating to study abroad programs conducted by the University of California or the California State University.

(2) Contracts relating to international teaching, research, or public service activities and projects conducted by the University of California or the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 844, Sec. 2.   (AB 848)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. State Agency Buy Recycled Campaign [12153. - 12217.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12153. - 12156.]

12153.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is the policy of the state to conserve and protect resources for future citizens as well as the current population of the state.

(b) It is in the best interest of the people of the state that the state alter its perception of solid waste to instead look upon this waste as resources that can be recovered and reused.

(c) It is in the best interest of reducing the increasing burden on communities disposing of the state’s solid waste for the state to take a role in developing an integrated state solid waste management policy, which includes source reduction, recycling, composting, market development, incineration, and landfills. Since recycling is a necessary component of this policy, the state shall encourage the use of recycled products to ensure that the state’s industries have sufficient and adequate markets for products regeneratively utilizing the state’s solid waste as recycled resources.

(d) It is the policy of the state to encourage the expansion of businesses located in California and, to whatever extent possible, to look favorably on California businesses in the recycling industry, which include, but are not limited to, those California businesses that manufacture, distribute, or act as brokers for, recycled products.

(e) Market development is the key to moving beyond the uneven collection of recyclable materials to stable resource recovery and reuse. Because of existing local collection programs, significant quantities of recycled resources such as the following are today available for purchase: fine grades of paper, high-quality paper products, plastics, retreaded automobile tires, rerefined lubricating oil, reused automotive parts, reclaimed solvents, recycled asphalt, recycled concrete, carpet or geotextiles composed of recycled plastics, compost and co-compost products, and steel products.

(f) In making these findings, the Legislature declares that the policy and intent of this chapter is to set an example for the state and nation to encourage the purchase of products utilizing recycled resources.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature, whenever economically feasible and as markets allow, to continually expand the policies of the state to utilize recycled resources in the daily operations of the state. This includes, but is not limited to, the procurement and purchase of recycled materials, the use of recycled resources in the performance of a service or project for the state, and the purchase of equipment used for the collection and sale of waste materials generated by the state.
